tr: Römork elektrik devresi: 12 V yardımcı güç (şarj hattı); Yardımcı/orta pim; Elektrikli römork freni çıkışı; Topraklama; Sol sinyal; Geri vites/yedek lambalar; Sağ sinyal; Stop/fren lambaları; Arka/seyir lambaları; Diğer
ja: トレーラー配線回路: 12 V 補助電源 (チャージライン); 補助 / センターピン; 電動トレーラーブレーキ出力; アース; 左ウィンカー; リバース / バックランプ; 右ウィンカー; ストップ / ブレーキランプ; テール / ランニングランプ; その他
pl: Obwód okablowania przyczepy: Zasilanie pomocnicze 12 V (linia ładowania); Pin pomocniczy/środkowy; Wyjście elektrycznego hamulca przyczepy; Uziemienie / masa; Lewy kierunkowskaz; Światła cofania; Prawy kierunkowskaz; Światła stop / hamowania; Światła tylne / pozycyjne; Inne
da: Trailertilslutningskredsløb: 12 V-hjælpestrøm (ladeledning); Hjælpe-/midterstift; Udgang til elektrisk trailerbremse; Jordforbindelse; Venstre blinklys; Baklys; Højre blinklys; Stop-/bremselys; Bag-/kørelys; Andet
ko: 트레일러 배선 회로: 12V 보조 전원(충전 라인); 보조/센터 핀; 전기 트레일러 브레이크 출력; 접지; 좌회전 신호; 후진/백업등; 우회전 신호; 정지/브레이크등; 테일/주행등; 기타
zh-CN: 拖车线路电路: 12 V 辅助电源（充电线）; 辅助/中心引脚; 电动拖车制动器输出; 接地; 左转向灯; 倒车灯; 右转向灯; 停车灯/刹车灯; 尾灯/行车灯; 其他
th: วงจรสายไฟรถพ่วง: ไฟสำรอง 12 V (สายชาร์จ); พินเสริม/กลาง; เอาต์พุตเบรกรถพ่วงไฟฟ้า; กราวด์; ไฟเลี้ยวซ้าย; ไฟถอยหลัง; ไฟเลี้ยวขวา; ไฟเบรก; ไฟท้าย/ไฟหรี่; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Circuitul de cablare al remorcii: Alimentare auxiliară 12 V (linie de încărcare); Pin auxiliar/central; Ieșire frână electrică remorcă; Masă; Semnalizator stânga; Lumini de marșarier; Semnalizator dreapta; Lumini de frână/stop; Lumini de poziție; Altele
hr-HR: Strujni krug ožičenja prikolice: 12 V pomoćno napajanje (linija za punjenje); Pomoćni/središnji kontakt; Izlaz električne kočnice prikolice; Uzemljenje; Lijevi pokazivač smjera; Svjetla za vožnju unatrag; Desni pokazivač smjera; Stop-svjetla / svjetla kočnice; Stražnja / pozicijska svjetla; Ostalo
hu: Utánfutó kábelezési áramkör: 12 V kiegészítő táp (töltővonal); Kiegészítő/középső érintkező; Elektromos pótkocsifék kimenet; Földelés; Bal irányjelző; Tolatólámpák; Jobb irányjelző; Féklámpák; Hátsó/helyzetjelző lámpák; Egyéb
ru: Цепи проводки прицепа: Дополнительное питание 12 В (линия зарядки); Дополнительный/центральный контакт; Выход электрического тормоза прицепа; Масса; Левый указатель поворота; Фонари заднего хода; Правый указатель поворота; Стоп-сигналы; Задние/ходовые огни; Другое
lt-LT: Priekabos laidų grandinė: 12 V papildomas maitinimas (įkrovimo linija); Pagalbinis / centrinis kontaktas; Elektrinių priekabos stabdžių išvestis; Įžeminimas; Kairiojo posūkio signalas; Atbulinės eigos žibintai; Dešiniojo posūkio signalas; „Stop“ / stabdžių žibintai; Galiniai / dienos žibintai; Kita
nl: Trailerbekabeling circuit: 12 V aux-voeding (laadkabel); Aux-/centerpin; Uitgang elektrische trailerrem; Aarding; Linker knipperlicht; Achteruitrijlichten; Rechter knipperlicht; Stop-/remlichten; Achterlichten/dagrijverlichting; Overig
pt-BR: Circuito da fiação de reboque: Energia auxiliar de 12 V (linha de carga); Pino auxiliar/central; Saída de freio elétrico de reboque; Aterramento; Luz de seta esquerda; Luzes de ré; Luz de seta direita; Luzes de freio; Lanternas/luzes de rodagem; Outro
bg-BG: Схема на окабеляване на ремаркето: 12 V допълнително захранване (линия за зареждане); Допълнителен/централен щифт; Изход за електрическа спирачка на ремарке; Маса; Ляв мигач; Светлини за заден ход; Десен мигач; Стоп светлини; Задни/габаритни светлини; Друго
el: Κύκλωμα καλωδίωσης τρέιλερ: Βοηθητική παροχή ενέργειας 12 V (γραμμή φόρτισης); Βοηθητική/μεσαία ακίδα; Έξοδος ηλεκτρικού φρένου τρέιλερ; Γείωση; Αριστερό φλας; Φώτα όπισθεν; Δεξί φλας; Φώτα στοπ/φρένων; Φώτα πορείας/θέσης; Άλλο
vi: Mạch điện rơ moóc: Nguồn phụ 12 V (đường sạc); Chốt phụ/chốt trung tâm; Ngõ ra phanh rơ moóc điện; Tiếp địa; Đèn báo rẽ trái; Đèn báo lùi; Đèn báo rẽ phải; Đèn dừng/đèn phanh; Đèn hậu/đèn chạy; Khác
pt-PT: Circuito da cablagem do reboque: Alimentação auxiliar de 12 V (linha de carga); Pino auxiliar/central; Saída do travão elétrico do reboque; Terra; Sinal de mudança de direção para a esquerda; Luzes de marcha-atrás; Sinal de mudança de direção para a direita; Luzes de travagem; Luzes traseiras/de presença; Outro
fi: Perävaunun kytkentäkaavio: 12 V lisävirta (latauslinja); Lisä-/keskinasta; Sähköinen perävaunun jarrulähtö; Maadoitus; Vasen suuntavilkku; Peruutusvalot; Oikea suuntavilkku; Jarruvalot; Taka-/huomiovalot; Muu
es: Circuito de cableado del remolque: Alimentación auxiliar de 12 V (línea de carga); Pin auxiliar/central; Salida para freno eléctrico de remolque; Tierra; Luz direccional izquierda; Luces de reversa/marcha atrás; Luz direccional derecha; Luces de parada/freno; Luces traseras/de marcha; Otro
cs: Elektroinstalace přívěsu: Pomocné napájení 12 V (nabíjecí linka); Pomocný/středový kolík; Výstup elektrické brzdy přívěsu; Uzemnění; Levé směrové světlo; Couvací světla; Pravé směrové světlo; Brzdová světla; Zadní/obrysová světla; Jiný
de: Stromkreise der Anhängerverkabelung: 12-V-Hilfsstrom (Ladeleitung); Hilfsstrom/Mittelstift; Ausgang für elektrische Anhängerbremse; Masse; Blinker links; Rückfahrlichter; Blinker rechts; Stopp-/Bremslichter; Rück-/Begrenzungsleuchten; Sonstige
fr: Circuit du câblage de remorque: Alimentation auxiliaire 12 V (ligne de charge); Broche auxiliaire/centrale; Sortie de frein électrique de remorque; Masse; Clignotant gauche; Feux de recul; Clignotant droit; Feux de freinage/stop; Feux arrière/de position; Autre
sk-SK: Obvod zapojenia prívesu: 12 V pomocné napájanie (nabíjacie vedenie); Pomocný/stredový kolík; Výstup elektrickej brzdy prívesu; Uzemnenie; Ľavé smerové svetlo; Cúvacie svetlá; Pravé smerové svetlo; Brzdové svetlá; Zadné/prevádzkové svetlá; Iné
en: Trailer wiring circuit: 12 V auxiliary power (charge line); Auxiliary/center pin; Electric trailer brake output; Ground; Left turn signal; Reverse/backup lights; Right turn signal; Stop/brake lights; Tail/running lights; Other
sl-SI: Ožičenje prikopnika: 12 V pomožno napajanje (polnilna linija); Pomožni/sredinski kontakt; Izhod za električne zavore prikolice; Ozemljitev; Levi smernik; Luči za vzvratno vožnjo; Desni smernik; Zavorne luči; Zadnje/pozicijske luči; Drugo
sv: Släpvagnens ledningskrets: 12 V reservström (laddningslinje); Reserv-/mittstift; Utgång för elektrisk släpbroms; Jord; Vänster blinkers; Backljus; Höger blinkers; Stopp-/bromsljus; Bak-/positionsljus; Övrigt
it: Circuito di cablaggio del rimorchio: Alimentazione ausiliaria a 12 V (linea di carica); Pin ausiliario/centrale; Uscita freno elettrico del rimorchio; Messa a terra; Indicatore di direzione sinistro; Luci di retromarcia; Indicatore di direzione destro; Luci dei freni/stop; Luci di posizione/ingombro; Altro
nb: Tilhengers ledningskrets: 12 V hjelpestrøm (ladelinje); Ekstrautstyr/senterpinne; Strømuttak for elektriske tilhengerbremser; Jording; Venstre blinklys; Ryggelys; Høyre blinklys; Stopp-/bremselys; Bak-/kjørelys; Annet
zh-TW: 拖車配線電路: 12 V 輔助電源 (充電線); 輔助/中心腳位; 電動拖車煞車輸出; 接地; 左轉方向燈; 倒車燈; 右轉方向燈; 停止/煞車燈; 尾燈/日行燈; 其他